Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2124.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 21A(Reserved)CHAPTER 21BUNIFORM REAL PROPERTY TRANSFER ON DEATHSec.21B01. Short title of chapter.21B02. Definitions.21B03. Applicability.21B04. Nonexclusivity.21B05. Transfer on death deed authorized.21B06. Transfer on death deed revocable.123456789101112131415161718 21B07. Transfer on death deed nontestamentary.21B08. Capacity of transferor.21B09. Requirements.21B10. Notice, delivery, acceptance and consideration not required.21B11. Revocation.21B12. Effect of transfer on death deed during transferor's life.21B13. Effect of transfer on death deed on transferor's death or divorce.21B14. Slayer or elder abuser.21B15. Disclaimer.21B16. Simultaneous death.21B17. Elective share.21B18. Liability for creditor claims and statutory allowances.21B19. Warning.21B20. Optional form of deed.21B21. Optional form of revocation.21B22. Prior deeds.§ 21B01. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Real Property Transfer on Death Act.§ 21B02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Beneficiary." A person that receives property under a transfer on death deed."Designated alternate beneficiary." A person that receives property under a transfer on death deed when the designated 20260HB2124PN2744 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beneficiary predeceases the transferor."Designated beneficiary." A person designated to receive property in a transfer on death deed."Joint owner." An individual who owns property concurrently with one or more other individuals with a right of survivorship. The term includes a joint tenant, owner of property with a right of survivorship and tenant by the entirety. The term does not include a tenant in common."Lapse." When a designated beneficiary predeceases a transferor and no designated alternate beneficiary is named."Person." An individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity."Property." An interest in real property located in this Commonwealth which is transferable on the death of the owner."Transfer on death deed." A deed authorized under this chapter."Transferor." An individual who makes a transfer on death deed.§ 21B03. Applicability.This chapter applies to a transfer on death deed made before, on or after the effective date of this section by a transferor dying on or after the effective date of this section.§ 21B04. Nonexclusivity.This chapter does not affect any method of transferring property otherwise permitted under the law of this Commonwealth.§ 21B05. Transfer on death deed authorized.An individual may transfer property to one or more 20260HB2124PN2744 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beneficiaries effective at the transferor's death by a transfer on death deed. The transfer may be made to a custodian under Chapter 53 (relating to Pennsylvania Uniform Transfers to Minors Act).§ 21B06. Transfer on death deed revocable.A transfer on death deed is revocable even if the deed or another instrument contains a contrary provision.§ 21B07. Transfer on death deed nontestamentary.A transfer on death deed is nontestamentary.§ 21B08. Capacity of transferor.The capacity required to make or revoke a transfer on death deed is the same as the capacity required to make a will.§ 21B09. Requirements.A transfer on death deed:(1) except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), must contain the essential elements and formalities of a properly recordable deed;(2) must state that the transfer to the designated beneficiary is to occur at the transferor's death; and(3) must be recorded before the transferor's death in the public records in the office of the county recorder of deeds of the county where the property is located.§ 21B10. Notice, delivery, acceptance and consideration not required.A transfer on death deed is effective without:(1) notice or delivery to or acceptance by the designated beneficiary during the transferor's life; or(2) consideration.§ 21B11. Revocation.(a) Revocation authorized.--Subject to subsection (b), an 20260HB2124PN2744 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 instrument is effective to revoke a transfer on death deed recorded as required by section 21B09(3) (relating to requirements), or any part of it, only if the instrument:(1) is one of the following:(i) a transfer on death deed that revokes the deed or part of the deed expressly or by inconsistency;(ii) an instrument of revocation that expressly revokes the deed or part of the deed; or(iii) a deed that revokes the transfer on death deed or part of the deed expressly or by inconsistency; and(2) is acknowledged by the transferor after the acknowledgment of the transfer on death deed being revoked and recorded before the transferor's death in the office of the county recorder of deeds of the county where the transfer on death deed is recorded.(b) More than one transferor.--If a transfer on death deed is made by more than one transferor, the following apply:(1) revocation by a transferor does not affect the deed as to the interest of another transferor; and(2) a transfer on death deed made by joint owners is revoked only if it is revoked by all the living joint owners.(c) Transfer not limited.--This section does not limit a transferor's ability to transfer the property during the transferor's life.§ 21B12. Effect of transfer on death deed during transferor's life.(a) General rule.--During a transferor's life, a transfer on death deed does not:(1) affect an interest or right of the transferor or any other owner, including the right to transfer or encumber the 20260HB2124PN2744 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property;(2) affect an interest or right of a transferee, even if the transferee has actual or constructive notice of the deed;(3) affect an interest or right of a secured or unsecured creditor or future creditor of the transferor, even if the creditor has actual or constructive notice of the deed;(4) confer any interest in the property to the designated beneficiary or affect the designated beneficiary's eligibility for any public benefit;(5) create a legal or equitable interest in favor of the designated beneficiary; or(6) subject the property to claims or process of a creditor of the designated beneficiary.(b) Not an asset transfer.--During a transferor's life, a transfer on death deed shall not be deemed an asset transfer of the property for assessing the transferor's eligibility for any public benefit.§ 21B13. Effect of transfer on death deed on transferor's death or divorce.(a) Death of transferor.--Except as otherwise provided in the transfer on death deed or this section, on the death of the transferor, the following rules apply to property that is the subject of a transfer on death deed and owned by the transferor at death:(1) Subject to paragraph (2), the interest in the property is transferred to the designated beneficiary in accordance with the deed.(2) The interest of a designated beneficiary is contingent on the designated beneficiary surviving the 20260HB2124PN2744 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transferor. The interest of a designated beneficiary that fails to survive the transferor lapses. If there are multiple designated beneficiaries, the effect of a lapse under this paragraph results in the transfer of the interest of the deceased designated beneficiary to the surviving beneficiaries. If all designated beneficiaries predecease the transferor, the beneficiaries' interests terminate and the property passes with the transferor's estate.(3) If the transferor has identified two or more designated beneficiaries to receive concurrent interests in the property, and the share of one or more designated beneficiaries lapses or fails for any reason, the share or shares shall be transferred to the remaining designated beneficiaries in proportion to the interest of each in the remaining part of the property held concurrently.(4) Subject to paragraph (3), concurrent interests are transferred to the beneficiaries in equal and undivided shares with no right of survivorship.(b) Divorce.--If the transferor and designated beneficiary are married to each other when the transfer on death deed is made, the following rules apply:(1) If a divorce decree is issued after the transfer on death deed was made and no deed was recorded subsequent to the issuance of the decree, section 2507(2) (relating to modification of circumstances) shall apply to the interest of the designated beneficiary as if the transfer of the property was a bequest in the transferor's will.(2) If the transferor dies before the issuance of a divorce decree, section 2507(2) shall apply to the interest of the designated beneficiary as if the transfer of the 20260HB2124PN2744 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property was a bequest in the transferor's will.(c) Beneficiary subject to interests.--Subject to section 1 of the act of April 24, 1931 (P.L.48, No.40), entitled "An act requiring the recording of certain written agreements pertaining to real property, and prescribing the effect thereof as to subsequent purchasers, mortgagees, and judgment creditors of the parties thereto," a beneficiary takes the property subject to all conveyances, encumbrances, assignments, contracts, mortgages, liens and other interests to which the property is subject at the transferor's death. For purposes of this subsection and section 1 of the act of April 24, 1931 (P.L.48, No.40), the recording of the transfer on death deed is deemed to have occurred at the transferor's death.(d) Joint owners.--(1) If a transferor is a joint owner who dies and:(i) is survived by one or more other joint owners, the property that is the subject of a transfer on death deed belongs to the surviving joint owner or owners with right of survivorship; or(ii) is the last surviving joint owner, the property that is the subject of a transfer on death deed belongs to the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries.(2) If the property that is the subject of a transfer on death deed is held as tenants by the entireties and becomes property held by tenants in common under other law of this Commonwealth as a result of the divorce of the joint owners, the interest of the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries lapses.(e) No covenant or warranty of title.--Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law of this Commonwealth, a transfer on 20260HB2124PN2744 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 death deed transfers property without covenant or warranty of title even if the deed contains a contrary provision.(f) Exempt from realty transfer tax.--A transfer of property pursuant to a transfer on death deed shall be exempt from the State and local realty transfer tax under Articles XI-C and XI-D of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, section 301.1 of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act, and the act of August 5, 1932 (Sp.Sess., P.L.45, No.45), referred to as the Sterling Act.(g) Due-on-sale provisions.--A lender shall not exercise a due-on-sale clause upon a transfer on death under this chapter to the extent prohibited by 12 U.S.C. § 1701j-3(d) (relating to preemption of due-on-sale prohibitions) or other law.§ 21B14. Slayer or elder abuser.A slayer or elder abuser as defined in section 8801 (relating to definitions) of a transferor shall be deemed to have predeceased the transferor as to property which would have passed to the slayer or elder abuser through a transfer on death deed.§ 21B15. Disclaimer.A beneficiary may disclaim all or part of the beneficiary's interest in property to be transferred under a transfer on death deed by recording a disclaimer under Chapter 62 (relating to disclaimers). An interest that is disclaimed under this section is deemed to have lapsed.§ 21B16. Simultaneous death.If all transferors and designated beneficiaries die simultaneously, the property to be transferred under a transfer on death deed shall vest in the estates of the designated 20260HB2124PN2744 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beneficiaries.§ 21B17. Elective share.Property transferred under a transfer on death deed shall be considered part of the transferor's probate estate for purposes of a spouse's right to an elective share under Chapter 22 (relating to elective share of surviving spouse).§ 21B18. Liability for creditor claims and statutory allowances.(a) Enforcement by probate estate.--To the extent a transferor's probate estate is insufficient to satisfy an allowed claim against the estate or a statutory allowance to a surviving spouse, the estate may enforce the liability against property transferred at the transferor's death by a transfer on death deed.(b) Apportionment.--If more than one property is transferred by one or more transfer on death deeds, the liability under subsection (a) is apportioned among the properties in proportion to their net values at the transferor's death.(c) Proceeding to enforce.--A proceeding to enforce the liability under this section must be commenced not later than 18 months after the transferor's death.§ 21B19. Warning.(a) Requirement.--A transfer on death deed shall contain the following warnings:WARNING: The property transferred remains subject to inheritance taxation in Pennsylvania to the same extent that it would if the transferor did not execute this transfer on death deed. Failure to timely pay inheritance taxes is subject to interest and penalties as provided by law.WARNING: The property transferred remains subject to 20260HB2124PN2744 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 claims for Medicaid Estate Recovery reimbursement to the extent necessary to discharge any such claim remaining after application of the assets of the transferor's estate.WARNING: If your designated beneficiary dies before you, the property will not transfer to them. If your designated beneficiary dies before you, you may wish to redo this deed or consult a lawyer.(b) Validity.--A transfer on death deed recorded as required by section 21B09(3) (relating to requirements) shall be valid notwithstanding the existence of any defects in the wording of the warnings required by this section or for failure to include any warning.§ 21B20. Optional form of deed.The following form may be used to create a transfer on death deed. The other sections of this chapter govern the effect of this or any other instrument used to create a transfer on death deed:(front of form)REVOCABLE TRANSFER ON DEATH DEEDNOTICE TO OWNERYou should carefully read all information on the other side of this form. You May Want to Consult a Lawyer Before Using This Form.This form must be recorded before your death, or it will not be effective.IDENTIFYING INFORMATIONOwner or Owners Making This Deed:___________________________ ______________________________Printed name Mailing address___________________________ ______________________________20260HB2124PN2744 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Printed name Mailing addressLegal description of the property: __________________________________________________________________________________________DESIGNATED BENEFICIARYI designate the following beneficiary if the beneficiary survives me.____________________ ________________________Printed name Mailing addressRelationship to owner or owners - OptionalDESIGNATED ALTERNATE BENEFICIARY - OptionalIf my primary beneficiary does not survive me, I designate the following alternate beneficiary if that beneficiary survives me.____________________ ________________________Printed name Mailing addressRelationship to owner or owners - OptionalTRANSFER ON DEATHAt my death, I transfer my interest in the described property to the beneficiaries as designated above.Before my death, I have the right to revoke this deed.SIGNATURE OF OWNER OR OWNERS MAKING THIS DEED_______________________________ (SEAL)________________Signature Date_______________________________ (SEAL)_________________Signature DateWARNING: The property transferred remains subject to inheritance taxation in Pennsylvania to the same extent that it would if the transferor did not execute this transfer on death deed. Failure to timely pay inheritance taxes is subject to interest and penalties as provided by law.20260HB2124PN2744 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WARNING: The property transferred remains subject to claims for Medicaid Estate Recovery reimbursement to the extent necessary to discharge any such claim remaining after application of the assets of the transferor's estate.WARNING: If your designated beneficiary dies before you, the property will not transfer to them. If your designated beneficiary dies before you, you may wish to redo this deed or consult a lawyer.ACKNOWLEDGMENT(insert acknowledgment for deed here)(back of form)COMMON QUESTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF THIS FORMWhat does the Transfer on Death (TOD) deed do? When you die, this deed transfers the described property, subject to any liens or mortgages (or other encumbrances) on the property at your death. Probate is not required. The TOD deed has no effect until you die. You can revoke it at any time. You are also free to transfer the property to someone else during your lifetime. If you do not own any interest in the property when you die, this deed will have no effect.How do I make a TOD deed? Complete this form or draft a transfer on death deed on your own or with legal assistance. Have it acknowledged (notarized) before a notary public. Record the form in each county where any part of the property is located. The form has no effect unless it is acknowledged (notarized) and recorded before your death.Is the "legal description" of the property necessary? Yes.How do I find the "legal description" of the property? This information may be on the deed you received when you became an owner of the property. This information is also available in the 20260HB2124PN2744 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 office of the county recorder of deeds for the county where the property is located. It is very important to obtain the proper "legal description" of the property. If you are not absolutely sure, consult a lawyer.Can I change my mind before I record the TOD deed? Yes. If you have not yet recorded the deed and want to change your mind, simply tear up or otherwise destroy the deed.How do I "record" the TOD deed? Take the completed and acknowledged form to the office of the county recorder of deeds of the county where the property is located. Follow the instructions given by the county recorder to make the form part of the official property records. If the property is in more than one county, you should record the deed in each county.Does the TOD deed allow my beneficiary to avoid inheritance taxes, Medicaid Estate Recovery or other debts I may have? No. Your beneficiary is still responsible for ensuring that your debts are paid, including inheritance taxes and Medicaid Estate Recovery.Can I later revoke the TOD deed if I change my mind? Yes. You can revoke the TOD deed. No one, including the beneficiaries, can prevent you from revoking the deed.How do I revoke the TOD deed after it is recorded? There are three ways to revoke a recorded TOD deed:(1) Complete and acknowledge a revocation form and record it in each county where the property is located.(2) Complete and acknowledge a new TOD deed that disposes of the same property and record it in each county where the property is located.(3) Record a deed that transfers the property to someone else during your lifetime. You may not revoke the TOD deed in 20260HB2124PN2744 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 your will.I am being pressured to complete this form. What should I do? Do not complete this form under pressure. Seek help from a trusted family member, friend or lawyer. You may be able to get free legal advice from a legal services organization.Do I need to tell the beneficiaries about the TOD deed? No, but it is recommended. Secrecy can cause later complications and might make it easier for others to commit fraud.I have other questions about this form. What should I do? This form is designed to fit some but not all situations. If you have other questions, you are encouraged to consult a lawyer. You may be able to get free legal advice from a legal services organization.§ 21B21. Optional form of revocation.The following form may be used to create an instrument of revocation of a transfer on death deed. The other sections of this chapter govern the effect of this or any other instrument used to revoke a transfer on death deed.(front of form)REVOCATION OF TRANSFER ON DEATH DEEDNOTICE TO OWNERThis revocation must be recorded before you die or it will not be effective.If you are the only owner of this property, this revocation form voids the transfer on death deed(s) you have previously signed and recorded, as long as you properly complete this revocation form and record it before your death.If you own this property as a "tenant in common" with other people, this revocation form voids only your proportional interest in the transfer on death deed(s) you have previously 20260HB2124PN2744 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 signed and recorded, as long as you properly complete this revocation form and record it before your death.If you own this property as a "joint tenant" or as a "tenant by the entirety" with another person(s) who is still alive, this revocation is not valid unless those other living person(s) also sign the revocation form.IDENTIFYING INFORMATIONOwner or Owners of Property Making This Revocation:___________________________ ______________________________Printed name Mailing address___________________________ ______________________________Printed name Mailing addressLegal description of the property: __________________________________________________________________________________________REVOCATIONI revoke all my previous transfers of this property by transfer on death deed.SIGNATURE OF OWNER OR OWNERS MAKING THIS REVOCATION_______________________________ (SEAL)_________________Signature Date_______________________________ (SEAL)________________Signature DateACKNOWLEDGMENT(insert acknowledgment here)(back of form)COMMON QUESTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF THIS FORMHow do I use this form to revoke a Transfer on Death (TOD) deed? Complete this form. Have it acknowledged (notarized) before a notary public or other individual authorized to take acknowledgments. Record the form in the public records in the 20260HB2124PN2744 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 office of the county recorder of deeds of each county where the property is located. The form must be acknowledged (notarized) and recorded before your death or it has no effect.How do I find the "legal description" of the property? This information may be on the TOD deed. It may also be available in the office of the county recorder of deeds for the county where the property is located. If you are not absolutely sure, consult a lawyer.How do I "record" the form? Take the completed and acknowledged (notarized) form to the office of the county recorder of deeds of the county where the property is located. Follow the instructions given by the county recorder to make the form part of the official property records. If the property is located in more than one county, you should record the form in each of those counties.I am being pressured to complete this form. What should I do? Do not complete this form under pressure. Seek help from a trusted family member, friend or lawyer.I have other questions about this form. What should I do? This form is designed to fit some but not all situations. If you have other questions, consult a lawyer.§ 21B22. Prior deeds.This chapter does not affect the validity or effect of any deed made prior to the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2124PN2744 - 17 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425